California statutes. Insurance Code
If a representation is false in a material point, whether affirmative or promissory, the injured party is entitled to rescind the contract from the time the representation becomes false.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

360.

The materiality of a representation is determined by the same rule as the materiality of a concealment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

The provisions of this chapter apply as well to a modification of a contract of insurance as to its original formation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. The Policy [380. - 460.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definition and Scope [380. - 396.]

380.

The written instrument, in which a contract of insurance is set forth, is the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

381.

A policy shall specify:

(a) The parties between whom the contract is made.

(b) The property or life insured.

(c) The interest of the insured in property insured, if he is not the absolute owner thereof.

(d) The risks insured against.

(e) The period during which the insurance is to continue.

(f) Either:

(1) A statement of the premium, or

(2) If the insurance is of a character where the exact premium is only determinable upon the termination of the contract, a statement of the basis and rates upon which the final premium is to be determined and paid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

381.1.

(a) The information described in subdivision (b) shall be provided to the policyholder at the time of application for, or issuance of, a policy of automobile insurance, as defined in Section 660, and in each renewal notice sent prior to the renewal of the policy. However, information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) may be provided to the policyholder separately upon request. The information shall not be presented as an abbreviation or code unless a key to the abbreviations or codes used is also included.

(b) For each rated driver or vehicle, as applicable, the number of incidents or other relevant data that apply to each of the following categories:

(1) Traffic convictions.

(2) At-fault accidents (property damage or bodily injury).

(3) Estimated annual mileage driven.

(4) Years of driving experience.

(5) Vehicle use (e.g., pleasure, commute, business).

(6) ZIP Code of the location where the vehicle is garaged, if different from the mailing address of the policyholder.

(7) Driver-related discounts applied.

(8) Vehicle-related discounts or surcharges applied.

(c) The disclosure of information required by this section may contain additional provisions that are not in conflict with, or derogation of, these provisions.

(d) Each insurer shall comply with this section no later than March 1, 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

381.2.

When a policy includes coverage for loss or damage to a specific item of personal property of the insured, which item is separately listed and described and on which item a separate amount of insurance is placed, the insurer shall compute any total loss of such item of personal property as being the amount of insurance placed on it. In the adjustment of a partial loss or damage to such item of covered property, the separately listed amount of insurance applying to the specific item shall be used as the value of the item prior to its partial loss or damage. If a different method is to be used in the computation of loss, the policy, and any application therefor, shall set forth, in type of prominent size, the actual method of such loss computation used by the insurer.

The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to any property used for a business purpose or to any motor vehicle.

If there are two or more policies insuring the same property against the loss, the loss shall be prorated among the policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 653.)
-------------------------------------------

381.5.

(a) Every policy issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state shall provide coverage for the registered domestic partner of an insured or policyholder that is equal to, and subject to the same terms and conditions as, the coverage provided to a spouse of an insured or policyholder. A policy may not offer or provide coverage for a registered domestic partner if it is not equal to the coverage provided for the spouse of an insured or policyholder. This subdivision applies to all forms of insurance regulated by this code.

(b) A policy subject to this section that is issued, amended, delivered, or renewed in this state on or after January 1, 2005, shall be deemed to provide coverage for registered domestic partners that is equal to the coverage provided to a spouse of an insured or policyholder.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that, for purposes of this section, “terms,” “conditions,” and “coverage” do not include instances of differential treatment of domestic partners and spouses under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 488, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

382.

Covering notes may be issued to bind insurance temporarily pending the issuance of the policy. Within 90 days after issue of a covering note a policy shall be issued in lieu thereof, including within its terms the identical insurance bound under the covering note and premium therefor.

Covering notes may be extended or renewed beyond such 90 days with the written approval of the commissioner if the commissioner determines that such extension is not contrary to and is not for the purpose of violating any provision of this code. The commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations governing such extensions for the purpose of preventing such violations and may by such rules and regulations dispense with the requirement of written approval by him in the case of extensions in compliance with such rules and regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 872.)
-------------------------------------------

382.5.

A binder which is issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed an insurance policy for the purpose of proving that the insured has the insurance coverage specified in the binder.

(a) As used in this section, “binder” means a writing (1) which includes the name and address of the insured and any additional named insureds, mortgagees, or lienholders, a description of the property insured, if applicable, a description of the nature and amount of coverage and any special exclusions not contained in a standard policy, the identity of the insurer and the agent executing the binder, the effective date of coverage, the binder number or the policy number where applicable to a policy extension, and (2) which temporarily obligates the insurer to provide that insurance coverage pending issuance of the insurance policy. For purposes of this section, “binder” does not include, and this section does not apply to, any writing that conditionally or unconditionally obligates an insurer to provide (1) life or disability insurance or (2) insurance in the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more.

(b) Except as superseded by the clear and express terms of the binder, a binder shall be deemed to include all of the usual terms of the policy as to which the binder was given, together with applicable endorsements as are designated in the binder.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a binder shall be valid for the period specified therein not exceeding 90 days from the date of execution of the binder or, if not specified, for that period of 90 days. No binder shall remain valid on or after the date the insurance policy is issued with respect to which the binder was given. Expiration of coverage under a binder shall not be considered a cancellation or nonrenewal of a policy of insurance within the meaning of any statute limiting the right to cancel or nonrenew a policy of insurance.

(d) If any party to a contract or other agreement refuses without reasonable cause to accept a binder as proof of insurance when that proof is required by the contract or agreement, that party shall be deemed to have breached the contract and the other party thereto, shall be entitled to appropriate injunctive relief and may recover damages for the breach and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. As used in this subdivision, “reasonable cause” includes, but shall not be limited to, any of the following:

(1) Inadequate coverage or inappropriate terms of coverage with respect to the interest of the vendor, lender, lessor, or other person providing a service to the insured.

(2) Failure of the insurer to meet the financial standards “lawfully” established by the lender for all insurers for the type of loan for which the insurance is obtained.

(3) Inability of the lender to determine if the insurer is licensed as an admitted insurer by the commissioner to transact the line of insurance for which the binder is issued.

(4) Failure of the insurance agent to provide the lender with written evidence of the agent’s authority to bind insurance coverage on behalf of the insurer under the binder.

(5) Failure of the binder to comply with this section.

(e) For purposes of all insurance policies providing collateral insurance coverage, binders issued in accordance with this section shall be deemed an insurance policy.

(f) The commissioner may suspend or revoke the license of any agent issuing or purporting to issue any binder of a type for which the agent lacks authority from the insurer named in the binder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 971, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

383.

It is a misdemeanor:

(a) For any insurer, or any agent of any insurer, to issue a policy in violation of the requirements of subdivision (f) of section 381.

(b) For any insurance agent or broker to assist in arranging for the insurance where the policy violates such requirements.

(c) For any insurer to violate the provisions of section 382.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

383.5.

“Document,” as used in this section, means a policy or a certificate evidencing insurance under a master policy. The policy or certificate shall conform to Section 381 and shall segregate the premiums charged for each risk insured against. The certificate, in lieu of specifying the risks insured against, may designate them by name or by description. “Document” also includes the applicable policy form and a subsequently issued declarations page conforming to Section 381 or an endorsement.

“Owner,” as used in this section, means any person who is named as an insured in the contract of insurance or document, or in a loss payable clause therein, and, whether or not he or she is named therein, the vendee, pledgor, or chattel mortgagor of a motor vehicle where insurance contracts subject to this section are procured with respect to the motor vehicle by or on behalf of either party to the purchase, pledge, or mortgage.

Every contract of insurance against hazards incident to ownership, maintenance, operation, and use of motor vehicles shall be embodied in a document.

The original or true copy of the document shall be delivered to each owner. Where it is executed by an insurer, the insurer shall deliver the original or a true copy to either of the following:

(a) The agent or broker who negotiated the insurance, for delivery to each owner of the motor vehicle.

(b) Each owner of the motor vehicle.

Any owner whose interest in the insured vehicle is for security purposes only may by written notice to the insurer waive delivery of the policy and in lieu thereof there shall be delivered to the owner a written certificate of insurance setting forth in brief form the matters specified in Section 381.

The agent or broker receiving the original or copy shall deliver one to each owner. Where coverage subject to this section is evidenced by a document executed by an agent licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1621) of Part 2, and not by an insurer, the agent and not the insurer is responsible for delivery of the original or a true copy to each owner.

The licenses of any agent or broker found by the commissioner after hearing to have violated this section may be suspended or revoked in accordance with the procedure provided in Article 13 (commencing with Section 1737) of Chapter 5 of Part 2, or the certificate of authority of any insurer found by the commissioner after hearing to have violated this section may be suspended or revoked in accordance with the procedure provided in Section 704.

The purpose of this section is to prevent fraud or mistake in connection with the transaction of insurance covering motor vehicles and in furtherance of that purpose the commissioner may make reasonable rules and regulations therefor. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 91.)
-------------------------------------------

383.6.

The phrase “motor vehicle” or “motor vehicles” as used in Section 383.5 includes, but is not limited to:

(a) Trailers, house trailers, mobilehomes, campers and all other wheeled vehicles or nonwheeled structures so made as to be capable of being moved as a compatible portion thereof, or trailed behind, any motor vehicle as that term is defined in the Vehicle Code, whether in immobile position or not.

(b) Motorcycles, motorbikes and motor scooters, except powered bicycles not manufactured for inclusion of a motor.

All present or future rules or regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to Section 383.5 shall be applicable to motor vehicles as defined in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

384.

(a) A certificate of insurance or verification of insurance provided as evidence of insurance in lieu of an actual copy of the insurance policy shall contain the following statements or words to the effect of:

This certificate or verification of insurance is not an insurance policy and does not amend, extend or alter the coverage afforded by the policies listed herein. Notwithstanding any requirement, term, or condition of any contract or other document with respect to which this certificate or verification of insurance may be issued or may pertain, the insurance afforded by the policies described herein is subject to all the terms, exclusions and conditions of the policies.

(b) This section is not applicable to a surplus line broker certificate as defined in Section 48.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 107.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

All policies issued by incorporated insurers shall be subscribed by the president or vice president, or chairman, or chief executive officer, or, in case of the death, absence, or disability of those officers, by any two of the directors, and countersigned by the secretary of the corporation. All such policies are as binding and obligatory upon the corporation as if executed over the corporate seal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 539, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

387.

When the name of the person intended to be insured is specified in a policy, it can be applied only to his own interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

388.

When an insurance contract is executed with an agent or trustee as the insured, the fact that his principal or beneficiary is the real party in interest may be indicated by describing the insured as agent or trustee, or by other general words in the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

389.

To render an insurance effected by one partner or part-owner applicable to the interest of his copartners, or of other part-owners, it is necessary that the terms of the policy should be such as are applicable to the joint or common interest.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

390.

When the description of the insured in a policy is so general that it may comprehend any person or any class of persons, only he who can show that it was intended to include him can claim the benefit of the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

391.

A policy may be so framed that it will inure to the benefit of whomsoever, during the continuance of the risk, becomes the owner of the interest insured.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

392.

Any exception from the risk generally covered by a policy of insurance which insures property for the period of time when such property is under the dominion and control of a party other than the insured for the purpose of storage or for the purpose of transferring such property to another location shall be printed in at least eight-point blackface type.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

394.

(a) The commissioner may approve insurance policies and associated materials in languages other than English if the following conditions are met:

(1) The policyholder is given a copy of the same material in English.

(2) The English version is the official version.

(3) A policyholder document in a language other than English shall contain a disclosure statement in both that language and in English that states that the English version is the official version and the foreign language version is for informational purposes only.

(b) An insurer that knowingly misrepresents information provided in a language other than English shall be subject to Article 6.5 (commencing with Section 790) of Chapter 1 of Part 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 358, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

395.

After a covered loss, an insurer shall provide, free of charge, a complete copy of the insured’s current insurance policy or certificate within 30 calendar days of receipt of a request from the insured. The period for providing the insurance policy or certificate may be extended by the commissioner. An insured who does not experience a covered loss shall, upon request, be entitled to one free copy of his or her current insurance policy or certificate annually. The insurance policy or certificate provided to the insured shall include, where applicable, the policy declarations page. This section shall not apply to commercial policies issued pursuant to Sections 675.5 and 676.6, and policies of workers’ compensation insurance, as defined in Section 109.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 96.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

396.

(a) An insurer shall do either of the following:

(1) Maintain a verifiable process that allows a policyholder to designate in writing or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 38.6 one additional person to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation of a policy for nonpayment of premium. The insurer shall notify the policyholder in writing or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 38.6 of this right at the time of the application or within 30 days after the inception date of an individual policy described in subdivision (f), and at least every two years thereafter. The notification described in this subdivision shall instruct the policyholder
 how to request the designation and how to replace or delete a designee. If a policyholder initiates contact with the insurer after the insurer has provided notice and the insurer complies with the policyholder’s request to establish or change the additional person to receive the notice described in this section, the insurer shall not be required to maintain additional verification.

(2) Comply with subdivision (b).

(b) An insurer that adopts the following procedure shall be deemed to have complied with subdivision (a).

(1) Unless an applicant for insurance has been provided notice of the right set forth in this section prior to inception of the policy, the insurer shall provide the policyholder, within 30 days after the inception
 date of an individual policy described in subdivision (f), with notice of the right to designate one person, in addition to the policyholder, to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation of a policy for nonpayment of premium. The insurer shall provide each applicant or policyholder with notice in writing or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 38.6 of the opportunity to make the designation. That notice shall instruct the applicant or policyholder on how the applicant or policyholder is to submit the name and address of one person, in addition to the applicant or policyholder, who is to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation of the policy for nonpayment of premium.

(2) If after having been provided notice from the insurer of the right to designate an individual
 to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation for nonpayment of premium, the applicant or policyholder fails to designate an individual within 30 days, the applicant or policyholder shall be conclusively presumed to have declined the opportunity to exercise their right at that time.

(3) Notwithstanding subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 791.13 or any other law, the insurer shall retain and utilize as necessary the contact information provided in the written designation for the lifetime of the policy, and allow the policyholder to update the written designation if the policyholder so requests.

(c) (1) A policyholder retains the right to designate the one additional person to receive notice of
 lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation for nonpayment of premium at any time, at the initiative of the policyholder, regardless of whether the policyholder previously declined to exercise that right. At least every two years, the insurer shall notify the policyholder in writing or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 38.6, of whichever of the following applies:

(A) If a policyholder has previously provided a designation pursuant to this subdivision, in writing or by electronic transmission pursuant to Section 38.6, the right to change the prior designation by replacing or deleting a person to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation for nonpayment of premium.

(B) If the policyholder has not previously designated
 a person to receive the notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation for nonpayment of premium pursuant to this subdivision, the right to designate a person to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation for nonpayment of premium.

(2) The notice requirements in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (1) may be provided to a policyholder in a single notice and shall not require two separate notices.

(d) When a policyholder pays the premium for an insurance policy through a payroll or pension deduction plan, the requirements contained in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) need not be met until 60 days after the policyholder is no longer on that deduction payment plan.

(e) An insurance policy shall not lapse or be terminated for nonpayment of premium unless the insurer, at least 10 days prior to the effective date of the lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation, gives notice to the individual designated pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) at the address provided by the policyholder for purposes of receiving the notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation for nonpayment of premium. Notwithstanding any other law, notice shall be given by first-class United States mail, postage prepaid, within 10 days after the premium is due and unpaid. This subdivision does not modify requirements for notice to the policyholder of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation set forth in other sections of this code.

(f) This section applies only to
 policies of private passenger automobile insurance that provide coverage for six months or longer, policies of residential property insurance as described in subdivision (a) of Section 10087 that take effect or that are renewed after the effective date of this section, and policies of individual disability income insurance as described in subdivision (c) of Section 799.01, except if the premiums for the individual disability income policy are paid entirely by the employer.

(g) This section applies to policies that are issued and take effect or that are renewed on or after January 1, 2016.

(h) An individual designated by a policyholder pursuant to this section to receive notice of lapse, termination, expiration, nonrenewal, or cancellation of the policy for nonpayment of premium
 does not have any rights, whether as an additional insured or otherwise, to any benefits under the policy, other than the right to receive notice as provided by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   (SB 1242)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Types of Policies [410. - 413.]

410.

A policy is either open or valued.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

An open policy is one in which the value of the subject matter is not agreed upon, but is left to be ascertained in case of loss.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

A valued policy is one which expresses on its face an agreement that the thing insured shall be valued at a specified sum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

A running policy is one which contemplates successive insurances, and which provides that the object of the policy may be from time to time defined, especially as to the subjects of insurance, by additional statements or indorsements.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Insurer’s Name on Policy [430. - 430.]

430.

The policies issued by every insurer shall be entitled by its own name or a name approved by the commissioner under Section 881 or 882, printed on each policy in large bold type in at least as large as any other size type used in the policy or on the face page.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 737.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Warranties [440. - 449.]

440.

A warranty is either express or implied.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

441.

A statement in a policy of a matter relating to the person or thing insured, or to the risk, as a fact, is an express warranty thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

442.

A particular form of words is not necessary to create a warranty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

443.

Every express warranty made at or before the execution of a policy shall be contained in the policy itself, or in another instrument signed by the insured and referred to in the policy, as making a part of it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

444.

A warranty may relate to the past, the present, the future, or to any or all of these.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

445.

A statement in a policy, which imports that there is an intention to do or not to do a thing which materially affects the risk, is a warranty that such act or omission will take place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

446.

When, before the time arrives for the performance of a warranty relating to the future, a loss insured against happens, or performance becomes unlawful at the place of the contract, or impossible, the omission to fulfill the warranty does not avoid the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

447.

The violation of a material warranty or other material provision of a policy, on the part of either party thereto, entitles the other to rescind.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

448.

Unless the policy declares that a violation of specified provisions thereof shall avoid it, the breach of an immaterial provision does not avoid the policy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

449.

A breach of warranty without fraud merely exonerates an insurer from the time that it occurs, or where the warranty is broken in its inception, prevents the policy from attaching to the risk.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Inception Hours [460. - 460.]

460.

On and after January 1, 1972, every printed form of an insurance contract, including every policy, endorsement, rider, or any amendment thereof issued in this state by any insurer or issued for delivery in this state by any insurer shall state an inception hour for coverage of 12:01 a.m. of the date upon which it is to be dated. However, the contract may provide that the inception time shall not be prior to the time applied for. Unless a specific provision of this code otherwise prescribes or permits, the hour prescribed shall be standard time at the residence within this state, or the principal place of business within this state, of the insured.

This section shall not prohibit an insurer, directly or through an agent, from issuing a binder, whether it be oral or typed by insertions in blanks in a printed form, specifying an inception or termination hour other than 12:01 a.m. on the date upon which the coverage is to commence, or end, as specified in the standard form or forms issued as the normal policy. Such binder shall not be subject to Section 382 nor have the technical meaning therein ascribed to “covering notes.”

This section shall not prohibit an insurer from issuing any policy or contract on a normal printed form which contains a provision extending the period of coverage for either 12 hours preceding, or following, the effective hour otherwise required by this section.

This section shall not apply to:

(1) Life insurance as defined in Section 101 or such supplemental disability insurance as is defined in Sections 10271 and 10292.

(2) Marine insurance as defined in Section 103.

(3) Title insurance as defined in Section 104.

(4) Mortgage insurance as defined in Section 107.

(5) Mortgage guarantee insurance as defined in Section 119.

(6) Surety insurance, as defined in Section 105, or disability insurance, as defined in Section 106, unless, until, and to the extent following:

The commissioner, on or after the effective date of the amendment of this section at the 1969 Regular Session of the Legislature, from time to time, as to specific types, classes, or categories of such insurance, declares, by rules and regulations promulgated as provided by law, that this section shall apply. Such rules or regulations shall provide that no policy or other form required by law to be approved by the commissioner need be refiled for approval if the only change from a previously approved form is the inclusion or change of the inception or termination hour.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 656, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. The Premium [480. - 491.]

480.

An insurer is entitled to payment of the premium as soon as the subject matter insured is exposed to the peril insured against.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

481.

(a) Unless the insurance contract otherwise provides, a person insured is entitled to a return of his or her premium if the policy is canceled, rejected, surrendered, or rescinded, as follows:

(1) To the whole premium, if the insurer has not been exposed to any risk of loss.

(2) When the insurance is made for a definite period of time and the insured surrenders his or her policy, to that proportion of the premium as corresponds with the unexpired time, after deducting from the whole premium any claim for loss or damage under the policy that has previously accrued. The provisions of Section 482 apply only to the expired time.

(b) No contract
 for individual motor vehicle liability or homeowners’ multiple-peril insurance may contain a provision that mandates that the premium for the policy shall be fully earned upon the happening of any contingency except the expiration of the policy itself. This subdivision shall not apply to policy fees or membership fees.

(c) (1) Any insurance policy that includes a provision to refund premium other than on a pro rata basis, including the assessment of cancellation fees, shall disclose that fact in writing, including the actual or maximum fees or penalties to be applied, which may be stated in the form of percentages of the premium. The disclosure shall be provided prior to, or concurrent with, the application and prior to each renewal to which the policy provision applies. For purposes of this subdivision, an insurer offering workers’ compensation insurance, as defined in Section 109, may provide the disclosure with the
 quote offering insurance to the consumer prior to the consumer accepting the quote in lieu of disclosure prior to, or concurrent with, the application. Disclosure shall not be required if the policy provision permits, but does not require, the insurer to refund premium other than on a pro rata basis, and the insurer refunds premium on a pro rata basis.

(2) If an application is made by telephone, the disclosure shall be mailed to the applicant or insured within five business days.

(3) The disclosure may be made electronically pursuant to Section 38.6 in lieu of being mailed.

(4) This section does not apply to cancellations that are calculated subject to paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 673.

(d) This section shall not apply to policies of ocean
 marine insurance. For purposes of this section, “ocean marine insurance” means insurance of vessels or crafts, their cargos, marine builders’ risks, marine protection and indemnity, or other risks commonly insured under marine insurance governed by the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1880) of Part 1 of Division 2, and as distinguished from inland marine insurance policies.

(e) The disclosure requirements of subdivision (c) shall be prospective and shall apply only to policies issued or renewed on or after January 1, 2012.

(f) Nothing in this section shall require any additional disclosure of a fee or penalty for early cancellation if that disclosure is required by any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.   (AB 1696)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

481.1.

(a) In the event any conditional receipt, binder, or other evidence of temporary or implied insurance, except ocean marine insurance as defined in Section 481 and those classes of insurance as defined in Sections 101, 104, and 106, is canceled, rejected, or surrendered by the insurer, the coverage thereby extended shall terminate 10 days after written notice to the named insured is deposited, properly addressed with postage prepaid, with the United States Postal Service.

(b) Any conditional receipt, binder, or other evidence of temporary or implied insurance described in subdivision (a) shall remain in force for a period of at least 30 days from the date of its issuance unless sooner canceled, rejected, or surrendered pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 404.)
-------------------------------------------

481.5.

(a) Whenever a policy of personal lines insurance terminates for any reason, or there is a reduction in coverage, the insurer shall tender the gross unearned premium resulting from the termination, or the amount of the unearned premium generated by the reduction in coverage, to the insured or, pursuant to Section 673, to the insured’s premium finance company. The gross unearned premium shall be tendered within 25 business days after the insurer either receives notice of the event that generated the gross unearned premium, or receives notice from a premium finance company of a cancellation.

(b) (1) Whenever a policy other than a policy of personal lines insurance terminates for any reason, or there is a reduction in coverage, the gross unearned premium shall be tendered to the insured or, pursuant to Section 673, to the insured’s premium finance company. If the policy is not auditable, the gross unearned premium shall be tendered within 80 business days after the insurer either receives notice of the event that generated the gross unearned premium, or receives notice from a premium finance company of a cancellation. If the policy is auditable, the gross unearned premium shall be tendered within 80 business days after the insured provides all requested audit information to the insurer or the insurer’s designee.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an insurer shall not be required to tender the unearned premium within 80 business days if the final unearned premium amount cannot be determined due to the insured’s failure, in breach of a policy requirement, to cooperate with the insurer in a premium audit, or if the amount of the unearned premium determined by a premium audit remains in dispute.

(c) An insurer may tender gross or net unearned premium to an agent or broker, or net unearned premium to a finance company, but shall remain liable to the insured or finance company for payment of any portion of the gross unearned premium that the agent or broker fails to remit to the insured or premium finance company.

(d) Any unearned premium that an insurer fails to tender within the time periods specified in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall bear interest at the rate of 10 percent per annum from and after the date on which the unearned premium was required to be tendered. For the purposes of this section, the tender of any unearned premium to the insured or premium finance company shall be deemed complete upon the deposit of the unearned premium in the United States mail, prepaid, addressed to the named insured or premium finance company at the last known address, or to an agent or broker with an assignment pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(e) For the purpose of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Gross unearned premium” means the unearned portion of the full amount of the premium charged to the insured, including the unearned portion of any amount of the premium the insurer allocated to an agent or broker as commission.

(2) “Net unearned premium” means the gross unearned premium minus the unearned commission.
